dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="מסע__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ח/יסרון__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>יסרון</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרון</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרוני</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרוננו</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונך</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונך</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונכם</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונכן</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונן</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונו</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונה</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונם</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונות</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונות</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיי</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותינו</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיך</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותייך</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיכם</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיכן</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיהן</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיו</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיה</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סרונותיהם</l><r>יסרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="אקמול__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ג/ף__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ף</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פי</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פנו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פך</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פכן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פן</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פו</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פה</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>פם</l><r>ף<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="לס__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="קיצון"><i>קיצון</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מסרק"><i>מסרק</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מעוײף"><i>מעוײף</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קטרקט"><i>קטרקט</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ליש"><i>ליש</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קוקו"><i>קוקו</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עקב"><i>עקב</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פירה"><i>פירה</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פטוצ'יני"><i>פטוצ'יני</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אמפר"><i>אמפר</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פונץ'"><i>פונץ'</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פורמלדהיד"><i>פורמלדהיד</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דקרון"><i>דקרון</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיפיליס"><i>סיפיליס</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שיג"><i>שיג</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פגוש"><i>פגוש</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אדרנלין"><i>אדרנלין</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ניײע"><i>ניײע</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ספק"><i>ספק</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מזוכיזם"><i>מזוכיזם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פלא"><i>פלא</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עבוט"><i>עבוט</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עבות"><i>עבות</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קונדישנר"><i>קונדישנר</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ערק"><i>ערק</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כלורופורם"><i>כלורופורם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שחם"><i>שחם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הפנינג"><i>הפנינג</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מצע"><i>מצע</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פלנקטון"><i>פלנקטון</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אופיום"><i>אופיום</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טרגון"><i>טרגון</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הקדש"><i>הקדש</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פמוט"><i>פמוט</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="הומניזם"><i>הומניזם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פולסר"><i>פולסר</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פוטבול"><i>פוטבול</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קמע"><i>קמע</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סורבה"><i>סורבה</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מסע"><i>מסע</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="צונמי"><i>צונמי</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פצײר"><i>פצײר</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כרוז"><i>כרוז</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="כהניזם"><i>כהניזם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מיקור"><i>מיקור</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סבל"><i>סבל</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ילק"><i>ילק</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גליל"><i>גליל</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שומקום"><i>שומקום</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ברוק"><i>ברוק</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אקמול"><i>אקמול</i><par n="אקמול__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ציאניד"><i>ציאניד</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שטר"><i>שטר</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="היכל"><i>היכל</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תענוג"><i>תענוג</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טרור"><i>טרור</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="תור"><i>תור</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סקס"><i>סקס</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="משקל"><i>משקל</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מקור"><i>מקור</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קוסמוס"><i>קוסמוס</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קבר"><i>קבר</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אינסטנט"><i>אינסטנט</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פשוש"><i>פשוש</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סך"><i>סך</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אוצר"><i>אוצר</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סיליקון"><i>סיליקון</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיסרון"><i>ח</i><par n="ח/יסרון__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אורח"><i>אורח</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דדאיזם"><i>דדאיזם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זעתר"><i>זעתר</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="אוסטאופורוזיס"><i>אוסטאופורוזיס</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גרמניום"><i>גרמניום</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קיקבוקסינג"><i>קיקבוקסינג</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פזײם"><i>פזײם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מקרא"><i>מקרא</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לוטו"><i>לוטו</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="טוטליטריזם"><i>טוטליטריזם</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גף"><i>ג</i><par n="ג/ף__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="רוסטביף"><i>רוסטביף</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="קילומטרז'"><i>קילומטרז'</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חזור"><i>חזור</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="פסײד"><i>פסײד</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="יובל"><i>יובל</i><par n="מסע__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דניס"><i>דניס</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="דומינו"><i>דומינו</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="שמד"><i>שמד</i><par n="לס__n_m"/></e>
